Utah statutes.
54-14-102.   Legislative findings.

(1) (a)  The Legislature finds that the construction of facilities by public utilities under this title is a matter of statewide concern.

(b)  The construction of these facilities may affect the safety, reliability, adequacy, and efficiency of service to customers in areas within the jurisdiction of more than a single local government.

(c)  Excess costs imposed by requirements of a local government for the construction of facilities may affect either the rates and charges of the public utility to customers other than customers within the jurisdiction of the local government or the financial viability of the public utility, unless the local government pays for those excess costs.

(2)  The Legislature finds that it is in the public interest to establish the Utility Facility Review Board to resolve issues regarding the construction and installation of public utility facilities.



Amended by Chapter 242, 2007 General Session

